North Carolina statutes. Chapter 63A. North Carolina Global TransPark Authority.
§ 63A-24.
General laws apply to Authority; exceptions.

Except as provided in this section, the general laws that apply to State agencies apply to the Authority. The following general laws, to the extent provided below, do not apply to the Authority:

Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes does not apply to contracts for services listed in 49 U.S.C. § 2210(a)(16) or contracts for special user projects. That Article also does not apply to other contracts for projects, but, with respect to these other contracts, the powers and duties established in that Article shall be exercised by the Authority and the Secretary of Administration, and other State officers, employees, or agencies shall have no duties or responsibilities concerning the contracts. However, the Authority shall: (i) submit all proposed contracts for supplies, materials, printing, equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) authorized by this subdivision to the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee for review as provided in

G.S. 114-8.3

; and (ii) include in all contracts to be awarded by the Authority under this subdivision a standard clause which provides that the State Auditor and internal auditors of the Authority may audit the records of the contractor during and after the term of the contract to verify accounts and data affecting fees and performance. The Authority shall not award a cost plus percentage of cost agreement or contract for any purpose.

Article 8 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes does not apply to public building contracts of the Authority, but, with respect to these contracts, the powers and duties established in that Article shall be exercised by the Authority and the Secretary of Administration, and other State officers, employees, or agencies shall have no duties or responsibilities concerning the contracts.

Except for

G.S. 146-29.1

, 146-79, and 146-80, Chapter 146 of the General Statutes does not apply to the Authority.

Article 31 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes shall not apply to a building located on State lands that is (i) privately owned or privately leased and (ii) located within the North Carolina Global TransPark, provided the requirements of

G.S. 58-31-2

are met.

Plan approvals by the Department of Administration for buildings, facilities, or projects located on State lands that are (i) privately owned or privately leased and (ii) located within the North Carolina Global TransPark do not apply, as provided in

G.S. 143-341(3)

a. and G.S. 143-345.11(a).

Notwithstanding G.S. 126-5(c1)(15), the Secretary of Transportation may designate employees of the Authority as subject to Chapter 126 of the General Statutes.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 2010-194, s. 11; 2011-326, s. 15(k); 2011-340, s. 1(f); 2012-194, s. 18; 2020-90, s. 2.2.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2020-90, s. 2.6, made subdivisions (a)(4) and (a)(5) of this section, as added by Session Laws 2020-90, s. 2.2, effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to projects initiated or contracts entered into, renewed, or modified on or after that date.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-326, s. 15(k), effective June 27, 2011, in the next-to-last sentence of subdivision (1), deleted “statewide and agency term” following “proposed” and inserted “and after” near the end.

Session Laws 2011-340, s. 1(f), effective July 1, 2011, added the last sentence in subdivision (3).

Session Laws 2012-194, s. 18, effective July 17, 2012, added the subsection (a) designation to the formerly undesignated introductory language; redesignated the former second sentence of subdivision (3) as present subsection (b); and, in subsection (b), substituted “G.S. 126-5(c1)(15)” for “this exemption from Chapter 146 of the General Statutes”and “Chapter 126” for “Chapter 146.”

Session Laws 2020-90, s. 2.2, added subdivisions (a)(4) and (a)(5). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 63A-25.
Dissolution.

Whenever the Board shall by resolution determine that the purposes for which the Authority was formed have been substantially fulfilled and that all bonds issued and all other obligations incurred by the Authority have been fully paid or satisfied, the Board may declare the Authority to be dissolved. On the effective date of the resolution, the title to all funds and other property owned by the Authority at the time of the dissolution shall vest in the State and possession of the funds and other property shall be delivered to the State.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.